src/import/nouns.lexc
keelustaja+N:keelustaja AASTA ;
keelustamine+N:keelustamine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@keelustus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@keelustus OLULINE ;
keem+N:k´eem%>%{pl.i%}%{rare%} PIIM ;
keemia+N:k´eemia AASTA ;
keemiakombinaat+N:k´eemia#k`ombin´aat TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@keemiasaadus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´eemia#s´aadus SUULINE ;
keemiatehas+N:k´eemia#tehas SOOLANE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@keemiatööstus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´eemia#t´ööstus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@keemik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@keemik VIRSIK ;
keenialane+N:k´eenialane OLULINE ;
keenialanna+N:k´eenialanna PERE ;
keenlane+N:k´eenlane OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@keep+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´eep TAUD ;
keeramine+N:k´eeramine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@keerang+N:@P.Stem.Nom@keerang VIRSIK ;
keerasmik+N:k`eerasm´ik ELANIK ;
@P.Stem.Nom@keerd+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´eerD1%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
keerdkäigustik+N:k´eerd#käigust´ik ELANIK ;
keerdkäik+N:k´eerd#k´äik%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
@P.Stem.Nom@keerdküsimus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´eerd#küsimus OLULINE ;
keerdsõlm+N:k´eerd#s´õl,m%>%{pl.i%} EIT ;
@P.Stem.Nom@keerdumus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´eerdumus OLULINE ;
keere+N:k´eerD1e PINGE ;
keere+N:k´eerE2 HAARE ;
keerenski+N:keerenski AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@keerik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@keerik VIRSIK ;
@P.Stem.Nom@keeris+N:@P.Stem.Nom@keeris SOOLANE ;
keeristorm+N:keeris#t´orm TAUD ;
keerisviljak+N:keeris#vil,jak VIRSIK ;
keeritis+N:keeritis OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@keerits+N:@P.Stem.Nom@keerits MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@keerlus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´eerlus SUULINE ;
keermestik+N:k´eermest´ik ELANIK ;
@P.Stem.Nom@keermestus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@keermestus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@keermik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´eerm´ik ÄMBLIK ;
@P.Stem.Nom@keerub+N:@P.Stem.Nom@keerub REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@keerukus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@keerukus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@keerulisus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@keerulisus OLULINE ;
keerusai+N:keeru#s´ai%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
@P.Stem.Nom@keerustus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@keerustus OLULINE ;
keerutamine+N:keerutamine OLULINE ;
keerutis+N:keerutis OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@keerutus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@keerutus OLULINE ;
keet+N:k´eet%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
@P.Stem.Nom@keetel+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´eetE2l REDEL ;
keetmine+N:k´eetmine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@keevalisus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@keevalisus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@keevis+N:@P.Stem.Nom@keevis SOOLANE ;
keevitaja+N:keevitaja AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@keevitatavus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@keevitatavus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@keevitus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@keevitus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@keevus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´eevus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kefaal+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kef´aal TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kefiir+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kef´iir TAUD ;
keha+N:keha%>%{pl.i%} KAVA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kehaehitus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@keha#ehitus OLULINE ;
kehahoid+N:keha#h´oiD1%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
kehakaal+N:keha#k´aal%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
kehakate+N:keha#k´atT1e PINGE ;
kehake+N:kehake PEENIKE ;
kehakeel+N:keha#k´eel%{stemill%} KEEL ;
kehakinnitamine+N:keha#kinnitamine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kehakinnitus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@keha#kin,nitus OLULINE ;
kehakuju+N:keha#kuju KAVA ;
kehakultuur+N:keha#kult´uur TAUD ;
kehakultuurlane+N:keha#kult´uurlane SUULINE ;
kehalaad+N:keha#l´aad, TAUD ;
kehaliige+N:keha#l´iiK2E2 HAARE ;
kehamaaling+N:keha#maal,ing VIRSIK ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kehand+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kehand REDEL ;
kehaosa+N:keha#osa%>%{pl.i%}%{stemill%} OSA ;
kehaseis+N:keha#s´eis%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kehasoojus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@keha#s´oojus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kehastus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kehastus OLULINE ;
kehatemperatuur+N:keha#temperat´uur TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kehatus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kehatus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kehavigastus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@keha#vigastus OLULINE ;
kehavorm+N:keha#v´orm TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kehitus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kehitus OLULINE ;
kehkadivei+N:k´ehkadiv´ei ARMEE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kehkats+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kehkats REDEL ;
kehkenpüks+N:kehken#p´üks ARGPÜKS ;
kehralane+N:k´ehralane OLULINE ;
kehralanna+N:k´ehralanna PERE ;
kehtestamine+N:kehtestamine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kehtetus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´ehtetus OLULINE ;
kehtimapanek+N:k´ehtima#panek VIRSIK ;
kehtimine+N:k´ehtimine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kehtivus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´ehtivus OLULINE ;
kehtivusaeg+N:k´ehtivus#´aE4G1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kehvik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kehvik VIRSIK ;
kehvikkond+N:k`ehvikk´onD1%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;
kehviktalupoeg+N:kehvik#talu#p´oE4G1%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
kehvistu+N:kehvistu AASTA ;
kehvtalupoeg+N:k´ehv#talu#p´oE4G1%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kehvus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´ehvus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kehvveresus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´ehv#veresus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@keigar+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´eigar REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@keiser+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´eisE2r REDEL ;
keisrihärra+N:k´eisri#härra PERE ;
keisrilkäik+N:k´eisril#k´äik%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
keisrilõige+N:k´eisri#l´õiK2e PINGE ;
keisrinna+N:k´eisrinna PERE ;
keisriproua+N:k´eisri#proua PERE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kekard+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kekard REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kekats+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kekats REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@keks+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´eks%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
kekstu+N:k´ekstu AASTA ;
keksumäng+N:keksu#m´äng%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kelder+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´eldE2r REDEL ;
keldrikorrus+N:k´eldri#korrus SOOLANE ;
keldrimüür+N:k´eldri#m´üür TAUD ;
keldriruum+N:k´eldri#r´uum RUUM ;
keldrisaal+N:k´eldri#s´aal, TAUD ;
kelgumägi+N:kelgu#mäG1%{stemill%} NIMI ;
kelgusõit+N:kelgu#s´õit%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kelgutus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kelgutus OLULINE ;
kelk+N:k´elk%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
kelkija+N:k´el,kija AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kell+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´ell%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
kellaaeg+N:kella#´aE4G1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
kellahelin+N:kella#helin MAGUS ;
kellaja+N:k´ellaja AASTA ;
kellakõla+N:kella#kõla%{stemill%}%{rare%} KAVA ;
kellalööja+N:kella#l´ööja AASTA ;
kellamees+N:kella#me MEES ;
kellanui+N:kella#n´ui%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} PIIM ;
kellanupp+N:kella#n´upp%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
kellaosuti+N:kella#osuti AASTA ;
kellapink+N:kella#p´ink TAUD ;
kellapomm+N:kella#p´omm TAUD ;
kellassepp+N:kellas#s´epp%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
kellatorn+N:kella#t´orn TAUD ;
kellaviietee+N:kella#viie#t´ee ARMEE ;
kellu+N:kellu PERE ;
kellukas+N:kelluka LOHAKAS ;
kelluke+N:kelluke PEENIKE ;
kelluklane+N:kelluklane OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kelm+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´el,m TAUD ;
kelme+N:k´elme PINGE ;
kelmemoodusti+N:k´elme#moodusti AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kelmikus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kel,mikus OLULINE ;
kelminägu+N:kel,mi#näG1u%{stemill%} KAVA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kelmur+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´el,mur REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kelmus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´el,mus SUULINE ;
kelmustükk+N:k´el,mus#t´ükk TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kelner+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´elner REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kelp+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´elp%>%{pl.i%}%{rare%} PIIM ;
kelt+N:k´el,t TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kelts+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´elts%>%{pl.i%}%{rare%} PIIM ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kemikaal+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k`emik´aal TAUD ;
kemiseerimine+N:kemis´eerimine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kemmerg+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kemmerg VIRSIK ;
kemoteraapia+N:kemo#ter´aapia AASTA ;
kempleja+N:k´empleja AASTA ;
kemplemine+N:k´emplemine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kemplus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´emplus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kemps+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´emps%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kenadus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kenadus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kenaff+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ken´aff TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kenotaaf+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k`enot´aaf TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kentaur+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kent´aur TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kentsakus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kentsakus OLULINE ;
kenuskael+N:kenus#k´ael%>%{pl.u%} KAEL ;
kepihirm+N:kepi#h´irm%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
kepike+N:kepike PEENIKE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kepinuhtlus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kepi#n´uhtlus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kepp+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´epp TAUD ;
keps+N:k´eps%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kepsatus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kepsatus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kepsel+N:@P.Stem.Nom@k´epsE2l REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kepsutus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kepsutus OLULINE ;
kera+N:kera%{stemill%}%{rare%} KAVA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@keraamik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@keraamik VIRSIK ;
keraamika+N:keraamika AASTA ;
kerake+N:kerake PEENIKE ;
keraslane+N:keraslane OLULINE ;
keraslill+N:keras#l´ill%>%{pl.i%} EIT ;
kere+N:kere%{stemill%} PERE ;
kerenumber+N:kere#n´umbE2r REDEL ;
keretäis+N:kere#t´äiS1%{stemill%} VARS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kergats+N:@P.Stem.Nom@kergats REDEL ;
kerge+N:k´erK2e PINGE ;
kergefaktoid+N:k´erge#fakt´oid TAUD ;
kergejõustik+N:k´erge#jõust´ik ELANIK ;
kergejõustiklane+N:k´erge#jõustiklane OLULINE ;
